Utah statutes.
53B-25-301.   Private right of action.

(1)  A person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may bring a civil cause of action against a postsecondary institution in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(2)  In an action brought under Subsection (1), if the court finds a violation of this chapter, the court shall award the aggrieved person not more than $500.



Enacted by Chapter 94, 2013 General Session

